Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-810
Prosecution; defense.

It shall be a defense to a prosecution under sections 28-808 and 28-809 that:

(1) Such person had reasonable cause to believe that the minor involved was eighteen years of age or more, and that such reasonable cause is based on but not limited to the presentation by the minor exhibited to such person of a draft card, driver's license, birth certificate, or other official or apparently official document purporting to establish that such minor was eighteen years of age or more;

(2) The minor was accompanied by his parent or guardian and such person had reasonable cause to believe that the person accompanying the minor was the parent or guardian of that minor;

(3) Such person had reasonable cause to believe that the person was the parent or guardian of the minor; and

(4) Such person's activity falls within the defenses to a prosecution contained in section 28-815.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 166.